verb/verb-part-irr.lexc
! -*- coding: utf-8 -*-
! University of Zurich - Institute of Computational Linguistics
! Morphology anlysis for Romansh: Irregular participles
! Author: Susanna Tron
! Modifications: Reto Baumgartner
! Date: June 2013

! The endings are divided into five groups:
! 1. like regular verbs in -ar: -à, -ada, -ads, -adas
! 2. like regular verbs in -air, -er or -ir: -ì, -ida, -ids, -idas
! 3. with a separate participle stem: -0, -a, -s, -as
! 4. like 3. but with no further s in masculine plural: -0, -a, -0, -as
! Duplicate. like 3. but with consonant doubling in the feminine forms: -0, -@a, -s, -@as

! Some verbs like "far","trair", "vesair", "metter", "cuvrir" and "dir" can be 
! combined with prefixes (e.g. "cuntrafar", "dismetter", "circumscriver", etc.) 
! are implemented separately. So there is some overgeneration.

! Regular forms that exist next to irregular ones have to be listed too
! as they otherwise would be overwritten.
!------------------------------------------------------------------------------!

Multichar_Symbols +Verb +PastPart +Masc +Fem +Sg +Pl

! Lexicon Root
LEXICON Root
  PastPartIrregStems;
  Prefixes;

! Prefixes which can be combined with the verbs of 'PrefixedPastPart'
LEXICON Prefixes
ad		PrefixedPastPart;
at		PrefixedPastPart;
circum	PrefixedPastPart;
com		PrefixedPastPart;
cumpro	PrefixedPastPart;
cun		PrefixedPastPart;
cuntra	PrefixedPastPart;
de		PrefixedPastPart;
des		PrefixedPastPart;
dis		PrefixedPastPart;
e		PrefixedPastPart;
emper	PrefixedPastPart;
ex		PrefixedPastPart;
in		PrefixedPastPart;
inter	PrefixedPastPart;
o		PrefixedPastPart;
per		PrefixedPastPart;
pre		PrefixedPastPart;
pro		PrefixedPastPart;
re		PrefixedPastPart;
read	PrefixedPastPart;
rein	PrefixedPastPart;
s		PrefixedPastPart;
satis	PrefixedPastPart;
scu		PrefixedPastPart;
sur		PrefixedPastPart;
sutta	PrefixedPastPart;
tra		PrefixedPastPart;
trans	PrefixedPastPart;

! Verbs that can be prefigated with the prefixes of 'Prefixes'
LEXICON PrefixedPastPart
cuvrir:cuvert	End3;
cuvrir:cuvr		End2;
dir:ditg		End3;
far:fatg		End3;
metter:mess		End4;
scriver:scrit	EndDuplicate;
trair:tratg		End3;
vesair:vis		End4;
vesair:ves		End2;

! Other past participle stems
LEXICON PastPartIrregStems 
agiuntar:agiunt		End3;
arder:ars			End4;
avair:g				End2;
avrir:avert			End3;
clauder:claus		End4;
cleger:cletg		End3;
cleger:cleg			End2;
coier:cotg			End3;
corrumper:corrut	EndDuplicate;
crair:cret			EndDuplicate;
crair:cart			End2;
cuar:cu				End1;
cumplanscher:cumplant	End3;
cumplanscher:cumplansch	End2;
cumponer:cumpost	End3;
cumponer:cumpon		End2;
cumprender:cumprais	End4;
cumprender:cumprend	End2;
cundecider:cundecis	End4;
cundecider:cundecid	End2;
cuvrir:cuvert		End3;
cuvrir:cuvr			End2;
dar:d				End1;
dastgar:dastg		End3;
decider:decis		End4;
decider:decid		End2;
decumponer:decumpost	End3;
decumponer:decumpon	End2;
decumprender:decumprais	End4;
decumprender:decumprend	End2;
defender:defais		End4;
defender:defend		End2;
dir:ditg			End3;
distinguer:distinct	End3;
distinguer:distingu	End2;
duair:du			End2;
emprender:emprais	End4;
emprender:emprend	End2;
encleger:encletg	End3;
entschaiver:entschet	EndDuplicate;
entschaiver:entschav	End2;
esser:st			End1;
evader:evas			End4;
exaurir:exaust		End3;
exaurir:exaur		End2;
excluder:exclus		End4;
exponer:expost		End3;
exponer:expon		End2;
exprimer:express	End4;
exprimer:exprim		End2;
extender:extais		End4;
extender:extend		End2;
extinguer:extinct	End3;
extinguer:extingu	End2;
far:fatg			End3;
fender:fess			End4;
fender:fend			End2;
fugir:fug			End2;
includer:inclus		End4;
includer:includ		End2;
interprender:interprais	End4;
interprender:interprend	End2;
interrumper:interrut	EndDuplicate;
invader:invas		End4;
ir:0				End2;
irrumper:irrut		EndDuplicate;
malencleger:malencletg	End3;
malencleger:malencleg	End2;
metter:mess			End4;
moler:mieut			End3;
morder:mors			End4;
mulscher:mulsch		End3;
murir:mort			End3;
nascher:nat			End3;
nascher:nasch		End2;
nuar:nu				End1;
offender:offais		End4;
offender:offend		End2;
offrir:offert		End3;
offrir:offr			End2;
opponer:oppost		End3;
opponer:oppon		End2;
perder:pers			End4;
perder:perd			End2;
persvader:persvas	End4;
persvader:persvad	End2;
planscher:plant		End3;
planscher:plansch	End2;
prencleger:perencletg	End3;
pretender:pretais	End4;
pretender:pretend	End2;
prevair:preves		End2;
prevair:previs		End4;
prevegnir:prevegn	End2;
proponer:propost	End3;
proponer:propon		End2;
prorumper:prorut	EndDuplicate;
pudair:pud			End2;
racoglier:racolt	End3;
retschaiver:retschet	EndDuplicate;
retschaiver:retschav	End2;
revair:revis		End4;
revair:reves		End2;
revolver:revieut	End3;
rir:ris				End4;
ruier:ruis			End4;
rumper:rut			EndDuplicate;
savair:sav			End2;
sclauder:sclaus		End4;
scriver:scrit		EndDuplicate;
scuder:scuss		End4;
scuder:scud			End2;
sfender:sfess		End4;
sfender:sfend		End2;
smerscher:smers		End4;
snuar:snu			End1;
sperder:spers		End4;
sperder:sperd		End2;
sponder:spons		End4;
sponder:spund		End2;
stizzar:stiz		EndDuplicate;
stizzar:stizz		End1;
storscher:stort		End3;
storscher:stursch	End2;
stuair:stu			End2;
succeder:success	End4;
succeder:succed		End2;
suffrir:suffert		End3;
suffrir:suffr		End2;
surencleger:surencletg	End3;
surencleger:surencleg	End2;
surprender:surprais	End4;
surprender:surprend	End2;
surrir:surris		End4;
suspender:suspais	End4;
suspender:suspend	End2;
suttaponer:suttapost	End3;
suttastar:suttast	End1;
svolver:svieut		End3;
svolver:svulv		End2;
taisser:tess		End2;
terrenisar:terren	End1;
torrer:tost			End3;
trair:tratg			End3;
tutgar:tutg			End3;
tutgar:tutg			End1;
unscher:unsch		End3;
unscher:unsch		End2;
vegnir:vegn			End2;
vesair:vis			End4;
vesiar:ves			End2;
volver:vieut		End3;
volver:vulv			End2;
vulair:vul			End2;

LEXICON End1  ! -à, -ada, -ads, -adas
+Verb+PastPart+Masc+Sg:à #;
+Verb+PastPart+Fem+Sg:ada #;
+Verb+PastPart+Masc+Pl:ads #;
+Verb+PastPart+Fem+Pl:adas #;

LEXICON End2      ! -ì, -ida, -ids, -idas
+Verb+PastPart+Masc+Sg:ì #;
+Verb+PastPart+Fem+Sg:ida #;
+Verb+PastPart+Masc+Pl:ids #;
+Verb+PastPart+Fem+Pl:idas #;

LEXICON End3	! 0, -a, -s, -as
+Verb+PastPart+Masc+Sg:0 #;
+Verb+PastPart+Fem+Sg:a #;
+Verb+PastPart+Masc+Pl:s #;
+Verb+PastPart+Fem+Pl:as #;

LEXICON End4   ! 0, -a, 0, -as
+Verb+PastPart+Masc+Sg:0 #;
+Verb+PastPart+Fem+Sg:a #;
+Verb+PastPart+Masc+Pl:0 #;
+Verb+PastPart+Fem+Pl:as #;

LEXICON EndDuplicate ! 0, -@a, -s, -@as  ("@" ensures consonant doubling).
+Verb+PastPart+Masc+Sg:0 #;
+Verb+PastPart+Fem+Sg:@a #; 
+Verb+PastPart+Masc+Pl:s #;
+Verb+PastPart+Fem+Pl:@as #;
